Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1109.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16174. (1) An individual who is licensed or registered under this article shall meet all of the following requirements: (a) Be 18 or more years of age. (b) Be of good moral character. (c) Have a specific education or experience in the health profession or in a health profession subfield or health profession specialty field of the health profession, or training equivalent, or both, as prescribed by this article or rules of a board necessary to promote safe and competent practice and informed consumer choice. (d) Have a working knowledge of the English language as determined in accordance with minimum standards established for that purpose by the department. (d) (e) Pay the appropriate fees as prescribed in this article. (2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1), an applicant for licensure, registration, specialty certification, or a health profession specialty subfield license under this article shall meet all of the following requirements: (a) Establish that disciplinary proceedings before a similar licensure, registration, or specialty licensure or specialty certification board of this or any other state, of the United States military, of the federal government, or of another country are not pending against the applicant. (b) Establish that if sanctions have been imposed against the applicant by a similar licensure, registration, or specialty licensure or specialty certification board of this or any other state, of the United States military, of the federal government, or of another country based upon grounds that are substantially similar to those set forth in this article, article 7, or article 8 or the rules promulgated under this article, article 7, or article 8, as determined by the board or task force to which the applicant applies, the sanctions are not in force at the time of application. This subdivision does not apply to an application for licensure that the board may grant under section 17011(4) or 17511(2). (c) File with the board or task force a written, signed consent to the release of information regarding a disciplinary investigation involving the applicant conducted by a similar licensure, registration, or specialty licensure or specialty certification board of this or any other state, of the United States military, of the federal government, or of another country. (3) Beginning October 1, 2008, an applicant for initial licensure or registration shall submit his or her the applicant's fingerprints to the department of state police to have a criminal history check conducted and request that the department of state police forward his or her the applicant's fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The department of state police shall conduct a criminal history check and request the federal bureau of investigation Federal Bureau of Investigation to make a determination of the existence of any national criminal history pertaining to the applicant. The department of state police shall provide the department with a written report of the criminal history check if the criminal history check contains any criminal history record information. The department of state police shall forward the results of the federal bureau of investigation Federal Bureau of Investigation determination to the department within not later than 30 days after the request is made. The department shall notify the board and the applicant in writing of the type of crime disclosed on the federal bureau of investigation Federal Bureau of Investigation determination without disclosing the details of the crime. The department of state police may charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of conducting the criminal history check. The criminal history record information obtained under this subsection shall must be used only for the purpose of evaluating an applicant's qualifications for licensure or registration for which he or she the applicant has applied. A member of the board shall not disclose the report or its contents to any person who is not directly involved in evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure or registration. Information obtained under this subsection is confidential, is not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and shall must not be disclosed to any person except for purposes of this section or for law enforcement purposes. (4) Before granting a license, registration, specialty certification, or a health profession specialty field license to an applicant, the board or task force to which the applicant applies may do 1 of the following: (a) Make an independent inquiry into the applicant's compliance with the requirements described in subsection (2). If subsection (2)(b) applies to an application for licensure and a licensure or registration board or task force determines under subsection (2)(b) that sanctions have been imposed and are in force at the time of application, the board or task force shall not grant a license or registration or specialty certification or health profession specialty field license to the applicant. (b) Require the applicant to secure from a national association or federation of state professional licensing boards certification of compliance with the requirements described in subsection (2). If an application is for licensure that the board may grant under section 17011(4) or 17511(2), the applicant is not required to secure the certification of compliance with respect to the requirements described in subsection (2)(b). (5) If, after issuing granting a license, registration, specialty certification, or health profession specialty field license, a board or task force or the department determines that sanctions have been imposed against the licensee or registrant by a similar licensure or registration or specialty licensure or specialty certification board as described in subsection (2)(b), the disciplinary subcommittee may impose appropriate sanctions upon the licensee or registrant. The licensee or registrant may request a show cause hearing before a hearing examiner to demonstrate why the sanctions should not be imposed. (6) An applicant for licensure, registration, specialty certification, or a health profession specialty field license who is or has been licensed, registered, or certified in a health profession or specialty by another state or country shall disclose that fact on the application form. (7) The department shall not promulgate or enforce a rule requiring an individual who is licensed or registered under this article to have working knowledge of the English language. Sec. 17062. An applicant for licensure as a physician's assistant shall meet the requirements of section 16174(a), 16174(1)(a) and (b), and (d) and be a graduate of a program for the training of physician's assistants approved by the task force or be a licensed, certified, registered, approved, or other legally recognized physician's assistant in another state with qualifications substantially equivalent to those established by the task force.